apertium-sme-sma.sma.lexc
LEXICON CNAME_EVEN ! Names ending in stressless vowel
+N+Prop+Sg: CNAME_EVEN_SG ;
+N+Prop+Pl: NIEJTE_PL ;
+N+Prop:    EVEN_ESS ;
+N+Prop+Attr: FINAL1 ;

  LEXICON CNAME_EVEN_SG
  +Nom:          FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:e%>m       FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:e%>n       FINAL1 ;
  +Ill:e%>se      FINAL1 ;
  +Ine:e%>sne     FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:e%>ste     FINAL1 ;
  +Com:%>ine      FINAL1 ;


LEXICON SAAMI_CNAME_EVEN ! Names ending in stressless vowel
+N+Prop+Sg: SAAMI_CNAME_EVEN_SG ;
+N+Prop+Pl: NIEJTE_PL ;
+N+Prop:    EVEN_ESS ;
+N+Prop+Attr: FINAL1 ;

  LEXICON SAAMI_CNAME_EVEN_SG
  +Nom:          FINAL1 ;
  +Nom:e          FINAL1 ;
  +Acc:e%>m       FINAL1 ;
  +Gen:e%>n       FINAL1 ;
  +Ill:e%>se      FINAL1 ;
  +Ine:e%>sne     FINAL1 ;
  +Ela:e%>ste     FINAL1 ;
  +Com:%>ine      FINAL1 ;


LEXICON DÅERIES
 +N+Prop+Sg+Nom:ies             FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Sg+Acc:%^1UMLas%>am      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Sg+Gen:%^1UMLas%>an      FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Sg+Ill:%^1UMLas%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +N+Prop+Sg+Ine:%^1UMLas%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Sg+Ela:%^1UMLas%>istie           FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Sg+Com:%^1UMLas%>inie            FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Pl+Nom:%^1UMLas%>h       FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Pl+Acc:%^1UMLas%>idie            FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Pl+Gen:%^1UMLas%>i       FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Pl+Ill:%^1UMLas%>idie            FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Pl+Ine:%^1UMLas%>inie            FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Pl+Ela:%^1UMLas%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop+Pl+Com:%^1UMLas%>igujmie FINAL1 ;
 +N+Prop:ies    N_ODD_ESS ;    ! normal noun
 +N+Prop+Attr:ies FINAL1 ;     ! name special

LEXICON TJIRREDS
+N+Prop+Sg+Nom:d%>%^DISIMPs             FINAL1 ;
+A+Sg+Acc:de%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
+A+Sg+Gen:de%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
 +A+Sg+Ill:d%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
+A+Sg+Ine:d%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
+A+Sg+Ela:d%>istie           FINAL1 ;
+A+Sg+Com:d%>inie            FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl:d N_ODD_PL ;
+A:d    N_ODD_ESS ;
 +N+Prop+Attr:d%>%^DISIMPs FINAL1 ;     ! name special




! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! Proper nouns
! ============


! The lexica
! ==========

LEXICON ProperNoun
 Abrahamme+Use/Sub:Abrahamm  SNAME_NIEJTE ;								!
Jupmele:Jupmiel SNAME_ODD ;
Jåhha:Jåhh SNAME_MAANA ;
Saara:Saar SNAME_MAANA ;
Nöörje:Nöörj SNAME_NIEJTE ;
 Tråante:Tråant SNAME_NIEJTE ; ! Trondheim
Sveerje:Sveerj SNAME_NIEJTE ;
Is^laante:Is^laant SNAME_NIEJTE ;
Russ^laante:Russ^laant SNAME_NIEJTE ;
Finn^marhke:Finn^marhk SNAME_NIEJTE ; 
Novr^laante:Novr^laant SNAME_NIEJTE ; 
Beer CNAME_EVEN ;
Esau NYSTØ ;
Hagar CNAME_ODD ;
Isak CNAME_ODD ;
Isma^el CNAME_EVEN ;
Isra^el CNAME_EVEN ;
Josef CNAME_ODD ;
Kain CNAME_EVEN ;
Kauto^keino ONAME ;
Kå^fjord CNAME_EVEN ;
Lot CNAME_EVEN ;
Oslove:Oslov VNAME_ODD ;
Rakel CNAME_ODD ;
Ruben CNAME_ODD ;
Sápmi:Sápm INAME ;
Tamar CNAME_ODD ;
Trond CNAME_EVEN ;
Eira:Eir SNAME_MAANA ;
Juda:Jud SNAME_MAANA ;
Rebekka:Rebekk SNAME_MAANA ;
Sodoma:Sodom SNAME_MAANA ;
Abrahamme:Abrahamme SNAME_NIEJTE; 
Manasse:Manass SNAME_NIEJTE ; 
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! Conjunction
! ===========


LEXICON Conjunction

ahte Cc ; ! XXX Added by FMT, check!
badth Cc ;
dellie Cc ;
jïh Cc ;
jah Cc ;
ja Cc ;
jå Cc ;
jallh Cc ;
jïllh Cc ;
aaj Cc ;
enn Cs ;
vïj Cc ;
men Cc ;
menh Cc ;
mohte Cc;
gonnoeh Cc ;
gon Cc ;
vuj Cc ;
 vyj Cc ; !XXX from dict, check!

LEXICON Cc
+CC:0 # ;




! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! First comes the continuation lexicon, in order to see it easier

LEXICON adv
+Adv: FINAL1 ;

LEXICON adv-interr-rel
 +Adv: FINAL1 ; ! We go for the sme way of doing things.
!+Adv+Interr:0
!+Adv+Rel:0

! Then comes the Adverb lexicon itself. There are many (sub)regular adverbial
! case patterns here, they are not encoded in the present system.

LEXICON Subjunction
aajne Cs ; 
 aellies Cs ; !XXX from dict, check!
ahte Cs ;
bene Cs ;
daamts Cs ; 
!dannasinie Cs ; moved to adv
dastegh Cs ;
dellie Cs ;
dle Cs ;
dlie Cs ;
eannan Cs ;
eeremes Cs ; 
goh Cs ;
gujhth Cs ;
guktie Cs ; 
ihke Cs ;
ihkie Cs ;
jalhts Cs ;
jalts Cs ;
 jihkie Cs ; !XXX from dict, check!
 jilhts Cs ; !XXX from dict, check!
jis Cs ;
joem Cs ; 
juhkoe Cs ; 
juktie Cs ;
jus Cs ;
læjhkan Cs ;
maaje Cs ;
mearan Cs ;
mearas Cs ;
medtie Cs ; 
sagki Cs ; 
vaallah Cs ; 
åpmoeh Cs ; 


LEXICON Cs 
+CS:0 # ;




! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! Pronoun
! =======


!Pointing to all the subgrops, presented in this order below.
LEXICON Pronoun

Reciprocal ;
Personal ;
Demonstrative ;
Interrogative ;
Indefinite ;
Reflexive ;

! The Reciprocal pronoun

LEXICON Reciprocal
sinsitnie+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Acc:sinsitniem FINAL1 ;
sinsitnie+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Gen:sinsitnien FINAL1 ;
sinsitnie+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ill:sinsætnan FINAL1 ;
sinsitnie+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ela:sinsitneste FINAL1 ;
sinsitnie+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Com:sinsitnine FINAL1 ;
sinsitnie+Pron+Recipr+Pl+Acc:sinsitnide FINAL1 ;


! Personal pronouns
! -----------------

! Personal pronouns, splitting in 1st, 2nd, 3rd
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - 

LEXICON Adverb
daaletje adv ; 
jahka adv ;
aatsolen adv ;  
 aaj-viht adv ; !XXX from dict, check!
aajmoe#laakan adv ; 
 aalloes adv ; !XXX from dict, check!
aarege adv ; 
aavne adv ; 
aejlies#laakan adv ;
aelhkies#laakan	adv ; 
aktelen adv ;
aktesi-aktesi adv ;
aktetje#leejne adv ;
akti#vyöki adv ;
 almetjen-lïgke+Use/Sub:almetjen-lïgke adv; !
alvas#laakan  adv ;
voepsijes-laakan adv ;
voepsijes#laakan adv ;
avtel#bodti adv ; 
baaltes adv ;
balnerge adv ;
bijjede adv ;
bijjelistie adv ; 
boerehke#laakan	adv ; 
buerie-laakan+Use/Sub:buerie-laakan adv; !
båajhtah#ligke adv ; 
båajhtoeh#laakan adv ; 
båastode adv ; 
bååstede adv ;
bæjngolen adv ; 
daagkoe adv ;
 daamtaj adv ; !XXX from dict, check!
dabpanahkh adv ;
daebpene adv ;
daemhtie adv ;
 dagka adv ; !XXX from dict, check!
 dajpeeli adv ; !XXX from dict, check!
dallegh adv ;
debpede adv ;
dejpeli adv ;
diekie adv ;
doegkoe adv ;
dogh% daagkh adv ;  
dohka adv ;
dubpede adv ;
duebpede adv ;
 dujmies-laakan+Use/Sub:dujmies-laakan adv; !	
duvlie adv ;
dåajmetje#laakan adv ; 
dåajmijs#laakan adv ; 
dæjmatjistie adv ;
eanghkoen adv ;
 eense-laakan+Use/Sub:eense-laakan adv; ! 
eensi#laakan adv ; 
ektese#vyöki adv ;
faagka adv ;
fierhten#beajjetje adv ; 
fïerhte adv ;
gaajeh#laakan adv ; 
gaarrede adv ;
garhpege adv ;
 gaskem adv ;!
geehpes#laakan adv ; 
 geerve-ligke+Use/Sub:geerve-ligke adv;  !
geesjele#laakan adv ; 
gellien#laakan adv ; 
gierkie#nuelieh adv ;
gogkoe adv ;
goske adv ; 
govloes adv ;
 guhkiem adv ; !XXX
gussie adv ;
gåabpalistie adv ; 
gåarhmede adv ;
gåavede adv ; 
gåessie adv ;
gååre#laakan adv ;
gïemhpes#ligke adv ; 
 gïjre-geasjege+Use/Sub:gïjre-geasjege adv;  !
gïjre#giesege adv ;
göökti-göökti adv ;
habjoeh#laakan adv ; 
hamhpoeh#laakan adv ; 
 hearven-laakan+Use/Sub:hearven-laakan adv;  !
 hijven-laakan+Use/Sub:hijven-laakan adv;  !
 hojhte adv ; !XXX from dict, check!
hïerven#laakan adv ; 
 ijtje-ligke+Use/Sub:ijtje-ligke adv;  !
 ikte#mearan adv ; !XXX from dict, check!
 iktst adv ; !XXX from dict, check!
 jeanasommes adv ; !XXX from dict, check!
 jeatjah-liktie+Use/Sub:jeatjah-liktie adv; !
jeatjah#liktie adv ;
jillege adv ; 
 jilliebisnie adv ; !	(litt) lenger i vest 
 jillielisnie adv ; 	!lenger i vest
 jissehts-lïgke+Use/Sub:jissehts-lïgke adv;  !
jååktatjasse adv ;
kaanne adv ;
kråavhtjoeh#laakan adv ; 
gomtehke#ligke adv ;
luvlebaase adv ;
luvlie adv ; 
 luvlielisnie adv ; !XXX from dict, check!
 lyövles-laakan+Use/Sub:lyövles-laakan adv;  !
lïjhkan adv ;
medtie adv ;
mojhteles#laakan adv ; 
mådtan#laakan adv ; 
 naemhtemes adv ; !XXX from dict, check!
njeeljh adv ;
 noerhtedh-vearelden+Use/Sub:noerhtedh-vearelden adv; !
 noerhteli adv ; !	nordafor (flere steder)
nualan adv ; 
 nåake#laakan adv ; !XXX from dict, check!
olkese adv ;
 raakth adv ; !XXX from dict, check!
rikti#laakan adv ;
saaht#laakan adv ;
 setnies adv ; !XXX from dict, check!
slassoeh-ligke adv ;
 striengkies-laakan+Use/Sub:striengkies-laakan adv; !
sueleds#laakan adv ;
 tjaekeds-ligke+Use/Sub:tjaekeds-ligke adv; !  
 tjaktje-gïjdege+Use/Sub:tjaktje-gïjdege adv; !
 tjiehpies-laakan+Use/Sub:tjiehpies-laakan adv;  !
tjietjelen adv ;
tjirkes#ligke adv ;
utne adv ;
vietseles#laakan adv ; 
vihth adv ;
vuelelen adv ; 
 våårege-laakan+Use/Sub:våårege-laakan adv; !
vïjhti-vïjhti adv ;
åajvoeh#laakan adv ; 
 åarjeldh-bïegken+Use/Sub:åarjeldh-bïegken adv; !	sønnavind !
ålkode adv ;
ålvoes#laakan adv ; 
åvtine adv ;  
isveligie:isveligie adv ; 
miehtjielistie:miehtjielistie adv ; 
maahte:maahte adv ;
eadtjohke#laakan:eadtjohke#laakan adv ;
båajhtoeh#laakan:båajhtoeh#laakan adv ;
tjiehpies#laakan:tjiehpies#laakan adv ;
jiesken:jiesken adv ;
bagkode adv ;
kranhtjode adv ;
njahkode adv ;
raagkode adv ;
slåahpode adv;
gogkoe+:gogkoe adv-interr-rel; ! váccán dagkoe, gogkoe don vázzet  
gosse    adv-interr-rel ; !  mon boadán, gosse don boadát
goske    adv-interr-rel ; !  mon boadán, gosse don boadát
guktie   adv-interr-rel ;  !slik som/at
gusnie   adv-interr-rel ;
gustie   adv-interr-rel ;
gubpene  adv-interr-rel ;
gubpede  adv-interr-rel ;
gåabpoeh adv-interr-rel ;
gåabpah  adv-interr-rel ;
gåaph    adv-interr-rel ;
 gåabph adv-interr-rel ;	   !! <== why no case?
guektien#daajesne adv ;
beelhten#nåelesne adv ;
flueresne adv ;
gïektjesne adv ;
iermesne adv ;
maejkesne adv ;
staelhpesne adv ;
vuerkesne adv ;
